dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.dic
abstraire/wL()
adjoindre/wB()
astreindre/wB()
atteindre/wB()
braire/wM()
ceindre/wB()
conjoindre/wB()
contrefaire/wD()
defaire/wD()
depeindre/wB()
deteindre/wB()
disjoindre/wB()
distraire/wL()
empreindre/wB()
enceindre/wB()
enfreindre/wB()
enjoindre/wB()
eteindre/wB()
etreindre/wB()
extraire/wL()
faire/wD()
feindre/wB()
forfaire/wF()
geindre/wA()
joindre/wB()
oindre/wB()
parfaire/wD()
peindre/wB()
poindre/wB()
raire/wM()
redefaire/wD()
refaire/wD()
rejoindre/wB()
repeindre/wB()
restreindre/wB()
reteindre/wB()
retraire/wL()
satisfaire/wD()
soustraire/wL()
stupefaire/wG()
surfaire/wD()
teindre/wB()
traire/wL()
